California statutes. Commercial Code
(2) The account debtor may assert against an assignee those claims and defenses that would have been available if the record included such a statement.

(e) This section is subject to law other than this division which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), this section does not displace law other than this division which gives effect to an agreement by an account debtor not to assert a claim or defense against an assignee.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 1003.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

(a) Unless an account debtor has made an enforceable agreement not to assert defenses or claims, and subject to subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, the rights of an assignee are subject to both of the following:

(1) All terms of the agreement between the account debtor and assignor and any defense or claim in recoupment arising from the transaction that gave rise to the contract.

(2) Any other defense or claim of the account debtor against the assignor which accrues before the account debtor receives a notification of the assignment signed by the assignor or the assignee.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c) and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), the claim of an account debtor against an assignor may be asserted against an assignee under subdivision (a) only to reduce the amount the account debtor owes.

(c) This section is subject to law other than this division which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(d) In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, law other than this division requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the account debtor’s recovery against an assignee with respect to claims and defenses against
 the assignor may not exceed amounts paid by the account debtor under the record, and the record does not include such a statement, the extent to which a claim of an account debtor against the assignor may be asserted against an assignee is determined as if the record included such a statement.

(e) This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 56.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

(a) A modification of or substitution for an assigned contract is effective against an assignee if made in good faith. The assignee acquires corresponding rights under the modified or substituted contract. The assignment may provide that the modification or substitution is a breach of contract by the assignor. This subdivision is subject to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the extent that either of the following apply:

(1) The right to payment or a part thereof under an assigned contract has not been fully earned by performance.

(2) The right to payment or a part thereof has been fully earned by performance and the account debtor has not received notification of the assignment under subdivision (a) of Section 9406.

(c) This section is subject to law other than this division which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(d) This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 1003.)
-------------------------------------------

9406.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, and (l), an account debtor on an account, chattel paper, or a payment intangible may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor until, but not after, the account debtor receives a notification, signed by the assignor or the assignee, that the amount due or to become due has been assigned and that payment is to be made to the assignee. After receipt of the notification, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge the obligation by paying the assignor.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (h) and (l), notification is ineffective under subdivision (a) as follows:

(1) If it does not reasonably identify the rights assigned.

(2) To the extent that an agreement between an account debtor and a seller of a payment intangible limits the account debtor’s duty to pay a person other than the seller and the limitation is effective under law other than this division.

(3) At the option of an account debtor, if the notification notifies the account debtor to make less than the full amount of any installment or other periodic payment to the assignee, even if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(A) Only a portion of the account, chattel paper, or payment intangible has been assigned to that assignee.

(B) A portion has been assigned to another assignee.

(C) The account debtor knows that the assignment to that assignee is limited.

(c) Subject to subdivisions (h) and (l), if requested by the account debtor, an assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made. Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor, even if the account debtor has received a notification under subdivision (a).

(d) In this subdivision, “promissory note” includes a negotiable instrument that evidences chattel paper. Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (e) and (k) and in Sections 9407
 and 10303, and subject to subdivision (h), a term in an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note is ineffective to the extent that it does either of the following:

(1) Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the account debtor or person obligated on the promissory note to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note.

(2) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account, chattel paper, payment intangible,
 or promissory note.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Section 9610 or an acceptance of collateral under Section 9620.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (k) and Sections 9407 and 10303, and subject to subdivisions (h) and (i), a rule of law, statute, or regulation, that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, an account or chattel paper is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation does either of the following:

(1) Prohibits,
 restricts, or requires the consent of the government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or
 enforcement of a security interest in, the account or chattel paper.

(2) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account or chattel paper.

(g) Subject to subdivisions (h) and (l), an account debtor may not waive or vary its option under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(h) This section is subject to law other than this division which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(i) This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

(j) Subdivision (f) does not apply to an assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, a claim or right to receive compensation for injuries or sickness as described in paragraph (1) or (2) of
 subsection (a) of Section 104 of Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended, or a claim or right to receive benefits under a special needs trust as described in paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended, to the extent that subdivision (f) is inconsistent with those laws.

(k) Subdivisions (d), (f), and (j) do not apply to a security interest in an ownership interest in a general partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company.

(l) Subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, and (g) do not apply to a controllable account or controllable payment intangible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 57.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9407.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a term in a lease agreement is ineffective to the extent that it does either of the following:

(1) Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a party to the lease to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, an interest of a party under the lease contract or in the lessor’s residual interest in the goods.

(2) Provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the lease.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g) of Section 10303, a term described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is effective to the extent that there is either of the following:

(1) A transfer by the lessee of the lessee’s right of possession or use of the goods in violation of the term.

(2) A delegation of a material performance of either party to the lease contract in violation of the term.

(c) The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the lessor’s interest under the lease contract or the lessor’s residual interest in the goods is not a transfer that materially impairs the lessee’s prospect of obtaining return performance or materially changes the duty of or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on the lessee within the purview of subdivision (d) of Section 10303 unless, and then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material performance of the lessor.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9408.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (f), a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor that relates to a health care insurance receivable or a general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise, and which term prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to, the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in, the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, is ineffective to the extent that the term does, or would do, either of the following:

(1) It would
 impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest.

(2) It provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to a security interest in a payment intangible or promissory note only if the security interest arises out of a sale of the payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Section 9610 or an acceptance of collateral under Section 9620.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in
 subdivision (f), a rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official, person obligated on a promissory note, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation of a security interest in, a promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise between an account debtor and a debtor, is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation does, or would do, either of the following:

(1) It would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest.

(2) It provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to
 a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

(d) To the extent that a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor that relates to a health care insurance receivable or general intangible or a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in subdivision (c) would be effective under law other than this division but is ineffective under subdivision (a) or (c), the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible is subject to all of the following rules:

(1) It is not enforceable against the person obligated on the promissory
 note or the account debtor.

(2) It does not impose a duty or obligation on the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor.

(3) It does not require the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or performance from the secured party.

(4) It does not entitle the secured party to use or assign the debtor’s rights under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including any related information or materials furnished to the debtor in the transaction giving rise to the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

(5) It does not entitle the secured party to use, assign, possess, or have access to any trade secrets or confidential information of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor.

(6) It does not entitle the secured party to enforce the security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

(e) Subdivision (c) does not apply to an assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, a claim or right to receive compensation for injuries or sickness as described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of Section 104 of Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended, or a claim or right to receive benefits under
 a special needs trust as described in paragraph (4) of
 subsection (d) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended, to the extent that subdivision (c) is inconsistent with those laws.

(f) This section does not apply to a security interest in an ownership interest in a general partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability company.

(g) In this section, “promissory note” includes a negotiable instrument that evidences chattel paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 58.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9409.

(a) A term in a letter of credit or a rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice applicable to the letter of credit which prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of an applicant, issuer, or nominated person to a beneficiary’s assignment of or creation of a security interest in a letter-of-credit right is ineffective to the extent that the term or rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice does, or would do, either of the following:

(1) It would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter-of-credit right.

(2) It provides that the assignment or the creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the letter-of-credit right.

(b) To the extent that a term in a letter of credit is ineffective under subdivision (a) but would be effective under law other than this division or a custom or practice applicable to the letter of credit, to the transfer of a right to draw or otherwise demand performance under the letter of credit, or to the assignment of a right to proceeds of the letter of credit, all of the following rules apply with respect to the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter-of-credit right:

(1) It is not enforceable against the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary.

(2) It imposes no duties or obligations on the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary.

(3) It does not require the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or other performance from the secured party.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 1003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Filing [9501. - 9528.]

9501.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if the local law of this state governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or agricultural lien is either of the following:

(1) The office designated for the filing or recording of a record of a mortgage on the related real
 property, if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(A) The collateral is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut.

(B) The financing statement is filed as a fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures.

(2) The office of the Secretary of State in all other cases, including a case in which the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures and the financing statement is not filed as a fixture filing.

(b) The office in which to file a financing statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of a transmitting utility is the office of the Secretary of State. The financing statement also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the financing statement
 which is or is to become fixtures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a financing statement is sufficient only if it satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) It provides the name of the debtor.

(2) It provides the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party.

(3) It indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 9501, to be sufficient, a financing statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to become fixtures, must
 satisfy subdivision (a) and also satisfy all of the following conditions:

(1) Indicate that it covers this type of collateral.

(2) Indicate that it is to be recorded in the real property records.

(3) Provide a description of the real property to which the collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained in a record of the mortgage of the real property.

(4) If the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real property, provide the name of a record owner.

(c) A record of a mortgage is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing
 statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers.

(2) The goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real property described in the record or the collateral is related to the real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut.

(3) The record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement in this section, except that both of the following apply:

(A) The record need not indicate that it is to be filed in the real property records.

(B) The record sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an individual if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 9503 applies.

(4) The record is duly recorded.

(d) A financing statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a security interest otherwise attaches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (AB 771)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

(a) A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the debtor only if it does so in accordance with the following rules:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered organization’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the registered organization’s name.

(2) Subject to subdivision (f), if the collateral is being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative.

(3) If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered organization, only if the financing statement satisfies both of the following conditions:

(A) Provides, as the name of the debtor, either of the following:

(i) If the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the trust, the name specified.

(ii) If the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator.

(B) In a separate part of the financing statement, the following information is provided, as applicable:

(i) If the name is provided in accordance with clause (i) of subparagraph (A), the financing statement indicates that the collateral is held in a trust.

(ii) If the name is provided in accordance with clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), the financing statement provides additional information sufficient to distinguish the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the additional information so
 indicates.

(4) Subject to subdivision (g), if the debtor is an individual to whom the Department of Motor Vehicles has issued a driver’s license that has not expired or an identification card that has not expired, only if the financing statement provides the name of the individual indicated on that driver’s license or identification card.

(5) If debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) does not apply, only if the financing statement provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor.

(6) In other cases, according to the following rules:

(A) If the debtor has a name, only if the financing statement provides the
 organizational name of the debtor.

(B) If the debtor does not have a name, only if the financing statement provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.

(7) Subject to the following sentence of this paragraph, it is a violation of Section 51 of the Civil Code for a secured party or proposed secured party to decline to provide credit to a debtor or proposed debtor, or offer to make the terms and conditions of the credit less favorable to the debtor or proposed debtor if (A) that decision was based on the fact that the debtor’s name to be included on the financing statement is or would be that provided under paragraph (5) rather than under
 paragraph (4), and (B) all elements that would be required to establish a claim for violation of Section 51 of the Civil Code are established. Any affirmative defenses that would be available to a claim under Section 51 of the Civil Code would be affirmative defenses to a claim under this paragraph. This paragraph shall not be construed to alter, expand, limit, or negate any other rights, defenses, or remedies under Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(b) A financing statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subdivision (a) is not rendered ineffective by the absence of either of the following:

(1) A trade name or other name of the debtor.

(2) Unless required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision
 (a), names of partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor.

(c) A financing statement that provides only the debtor’s trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

(d) Failure to indicate the representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

(e) A financing statement may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than one secured party.

(f) The name of the decedent indicated on the order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as
 the “name of the decedent” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) If the Department of Motor Vehicles has issued to an individual more than one driver’s licenses or identification cards of a kind described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) refers to the most recently issued license or card.

(h) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Driver’s license” and “identification card” includes a driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Name of the settlor or testator” means either of the following:

(A) If the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is stated to be the settlor’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the settlor’s name.

(B) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated in the trust’s organic record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9504.

A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if the financing statement provides either of the following:

(1) A description of the collateral pursuant to Section 9108.

(2) An indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all personal property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

(a) A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing statement, or may comply with a statute or treaty described in subdivision (a) of Section 9311, using the terms “consignor,” “consignee,” “lessor,” “lessee,” “bailor,” “bailee,” “licensor,” “licensee,” “owner,” “registered owner,” “buyer,” “seller,” or words of similar import, instead of the terms “secured
 party” and “debtor.”

(b) This chapter applies to the filing of a financing statement under subdivision (a) and, as appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing statement under subdivision (b) of Section 9311, but the filing or compliance is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner, or buyer which attaches to the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

(a) A financing statement substantially satisfying the requirements of this part is effective, even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 9503 is seriously misleading.

(c) If a search of the records of the filing office under the debtor’s correct name, using the filing office’s standard search logic, if any, would disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 9503, the name provided does not make the financing statement seriously misleading.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 9508, the “debtor’s correct name” in subdivision (c) means the correct name of the new debtor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9507.

(a) A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues, even if the secured party knows of or consents to the disposition.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) and in Section
 9508, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under Section 9506.

(c) If the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under subdivision (a) of Section 9503 so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under Section 9506, the following rules apply:

(1) The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four months after, the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading.

(2) The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four months after the filed
 financing statement becomes seriously misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement which renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed within four months after the financing statement became seriously misleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 17.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a filed financing statement naming an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent that the financing statement would have been effective had the original debtor acquired rights in the collateral.

(b) If the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the new debtor causes a filed financing statement
 that is effective under subdivision (a) to be seriously misleading under Section 9506, the following rules apply:

(1) The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under subdivision (d) of Section 9203.

(2) The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than four months after the new debtor becomes bound under subdivision (d) of Section 9203 unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.

(c) This section does not apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains effective against the new debtor under subdivision (a) of Section
 9507.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9509.

(a) A person may file an initial financing statement, an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement, or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The debtor authorizes the filing in a signed record or pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c).

(2) The person holds an agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the financing statement covers
 only collateral in which the person holds an agricultural lien.

(b) By signing or becoming bound as debtor by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering both of the following:

(1) The collateral described in the security agreement.

(2) Property that becomes collateral under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9315, whether or not the security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

(c) By acquiring collateral in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9315, a debtor authorizes the filing of an
 initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9315.

(d) A person may file an amendment other than an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The secured party of record authorizes the filing.

(2) The amendment is a termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party of record has failed to file or send a termination statement as required by subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 9513, the debtor authorizes the filing, and the termination
 statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

(e) If there is more than one secured party of record for a financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of an amendment under subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 59.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9510.

(a) A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under Section 9509.

(b) A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

(c) A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 9515 is
 ineffective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

(a) A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has been filed. If an initial financing statement is filed under subdivision (a) of Section 9514, the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.

(b) If an amendment
 of a financing statement which provides the name of a person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the person named in the amendment is a secured party of record. If an amendment is filed under subdivision (b) of Section 9514, the assignee named in the amendment is a secured party of record.

(c) A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an amendment of the financing statement which deletes the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

(a) Subject to Section 9509, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to subdivision (e), otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that does both of the following:

(1) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates.

(2) If the
 amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, provides the date that the initial financing statement was filed or recorded and the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 9502.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9515, the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

(c) A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

(d) A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

(e) An amendment is ineffective to the extent that it does either of the following:

(1) It purports to delete all debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement.
